Illinois, session 104th, SB3097.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-131)8    Sec. 5. Application and renewal. 9    (a) The Illinois State Police shall either approve or deny 10all applications within 30 days from the date they are 11received, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), and 12every applicant found qualified under Section 8 of this Act by 13the Illinois State Police shall be entitled to a Firearm 14Owner's Identification Card upon the payment of a $10 fee and 15applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall be 16limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 17electronic online payment system. Any applicant who is an 18active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a 19member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 20Reserve Forces of the United States is exempt from the 21application fee. $5 of each fee derived from the issuance of a 22Firearm Owner's Identification Card or renewals thereof shall 23be deposited in the State Police Firearm Services Fund and $5   SB3097- 2 -LRB104 18896 TRT 32341 b1into the State Police Firearm Enforcement Fund.2    (b) Renewal applications shall be approved or denied 3within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted his 4or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his or 5her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If a renewal 6application has been submitted prior to the expiration date of 7the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the 8Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall remain valid while 9the Illinois State Police processes the application, unless 10the person is subject to or becomes subject to revocation 11under this Act. The cost for a renewal application shall be $10 12and may include applicable processing fees, which shall be 13limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 14electronic online payment system, which shall be deposited 15into the State Police Firearm Services Fund. If the Illinois 16State Police fails to renew a Firearm Owner's Identification 17Card within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted 18his or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his 19or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the renewal 20application for the Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall 21be granted unless subject to revocation or suspension. 22    (c) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 23licensee under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act expires during 24the term of the licensee's concealed carry license, the 25Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the license remain 26valid and the licensee does not have to renew his or her   SB3097- 3 -LRB104 18896 TRT 32341 b1Firearm Owner's Identification Card during the duration of the 2concealed carry license. Unless the Illinois State Police has 3reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 4card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 5licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card and send a 6renewed Firearm Owner's Identification Card to the licensee.7    (c-5) Failure of the Illinois State Police to approve or 8deny an application or renew an application within the time 9frames under subsection (a) or (b) shall constitute a civil 10violation and, in addition to any other penalty provided by 11law, may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $500 12for each violation and, in the case of a continuing violation, 13every day the violation continues shall be deemed a separate 14violation. Penalties shall be collected by the State 15Treasurer, who shall deposit the money into the General 16Revenue Fund. 17    (d) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules concerning 18the use of voluntarily submitted fingerprints, as allowed by 19State and federal law. 20(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-131)23    Sec. 5. Application and renewal. 24    (a) The Illinois State Police shall either approve or deny 25all applications within 30 days from the date they are   SB3097- 4 -LRB104 18896 TRT 32341 b1received, except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), and 2every applicant found qualified under Section 8 of this Act by 3the Illinois State Police shall be entitled to a Firearm 4Owner's Identification Card upon the payment of a $10 fee and 5applicable processing fees. The processing fees shall be 6limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 7electronic online payment system. Any applicant who is an 8active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a 9member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 10Reserve Forces of the United States is exempt from the 11application fee. $10 of each fee derived from the issuance of a 12Firearm Owner's Identification Card or renewals thereof shall 13be deposited in the State Police Firearm Services Fund.14    (b) Renewal applications shall be approved or denied 15within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted his 16or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his or 17her Firearm Owner's Identification Card. If a renewal 18application has been submitted prior to the expiration date of 19the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the 20Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall remain valid while 21the Illinois State Police processes the application, unless 22the person is subject to or becomes subject to revocation 23under this Act. The cost for a renewal application shall be $10 24and may include applicable processing fees, which shall be 25limited to charges by the State Treasurer for using the 26electronic online payment system, which shall be deposited   SB3097- 5 -LRB104 18896 TRT 32341 b1into the State Police Firearm Services Fund. If the Illinois 2State Police fails to renew a Firearm Owner's Identification 3Card within 60 business days, provided the applicant submitted 4his or her renewal application prior to the expiration of his 5or her Firearm Owner's Identification Card, the renewal 6application for the Firearm Owner's Identification Card shall 7be granted unless subject to revocation or suspension. 8    (c) If the Firearm Owner's Identification Card of a 9licensee under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act expires during 10the term of the licensee's concealed carry license, the 11Firearm Owner's Identification Card and the license remain 12valid and the licensee does not have to renew his or her 13Firearm Owner's Identification Card during the duration of the 14concealed carry license. Unless the Illinois State Police has 15reason to believe the licensee is no longer eligible for the 16card, the Illinois State Police may automatically renew the 17licensee's Firearm Owner's Identification Card and send a 18renewed Firearm Owner's Identification Card to the licensee.19    (c-5) Failure of the Illinois State Police to approve or 20deny an application or renew an application within the time 21frames under subsection (a) or (b) shall constitute a civil 22violation and, in addition to any other penalty provided by 23law, may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $500 24for each violation and, in the case of a continuing violation, 25every day the violation continues shall be deemed a separate 26violation. Penalties shall be collected by the State   SB3097- 6 -LRB104 18896 TRT 32341 b1Treasurer, who shall deposit the money into the General 2Revenue Fund. 3    (d) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules concerning 4the use of voluntarily submitted fingerprints, as allowed by 5State and federal law. 6(Source: P.A. 103-609, eff. 7-1-24; 104-131, eff. 9-1-26.) 7    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 8changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 9that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 10represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 11not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 12made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 13Public Act.